Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2607
Insurance consultant, defined.

Insurance consultant shall mean any person who, for a fee, engages in the business of offering to the public any advice, counsel, opinion, or service with respect to insurable risks, or concerning the benefits, coverages, or provisions under any policy of insurance that could be issued in this state, or involving the advantages or disadvantages of any such policy of insurance, or any formal plan of managing pure risk. Insurance consultant does not include a public adjuster licensed under the Public Adjusters Licensing Act.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB743, § 20.

Public Adjusters Licensing Act, see section 44-9201.